Utah statutes.
16-10a-730.   Voting trusts.
(1)  One or more shareholders may create a voting trust, conferring on a
trustee the right to vote or otherwise act for them, by signing an agreement
setting out the provisions of the trust, and transferring to the trustee the
shares with respect to which the trustee is to act.  When a voting trust
agreement is signed, the trustee shall prepare a list of the names and
addresses of all owners of beneficial interests in the trust, together with
the number and class of shares each transferred to the trust, and promptly
cause the corporation to receive copies of the list and agreement.  Thereafter
the trustee shall cause the corporation to receive changes to the list
promptly as they occur and amendments to the agreement promptly as they are
made.
(2)  A voting trust becomes effective on the date the first shares subject to
the trust are registered in the trustee's name.  A voting trust is valid for
the period provided in the agreement, but not more than 10 years after its
effective date unless extended under Subsection (3).
(3)  All or some of the parties to a voting trust may extend the voting trust
for additional terms of not more than 10 years each by signing an extension
agreement and obtaining the trustee's written consent to the extension.  An
extension is valid for not more than 10 years from the date the first
shareholder signs the extension agreement.  The trustee shall deliver copies
of the extension agreement and list of beneficial owners to the corporation's
principal office.  An extension agreement binds only those parties signing it.
